src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!LEXICON IV_PUUQTTED !!= * @CODE@ puuʹtted:puutt
!+IV: V0_PUUQTTED ;
!LEXICON TV_PUUQTTED !!= * @CODE@ puuʹtted:puutt
!+TV: V0_PUUQTTED ;
LEXICON V0_PUUQTTED !!= * @CODE@ puuʹtted:puutt
!!! inflection_type="1"
! seek parallel in V_MUQTTED and V_JOAQTTED
! FORMS

!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: puuʹtted
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poott
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: poʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3


!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VV2V%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: puʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization 
:%^VOWLower%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) pooʹđ-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Imprt+Sg2: puuʹđ
!! Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,


!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWLower%^CC2C VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: poođas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: puttu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VV2V%^VOWLower VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: pottaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

! (10) Allegro for incoative: puʹđ»
:%^VV2V%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!! (11) Present Participle:
:%^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) +V+PrsPrc: puuʹtti

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:%^CC2C VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: puuđ-


LEXICON V_LAQDDED !!= * @CODE@ laʹdded:ladd
: V0_LAQDDED ;
!LEXICON IV_LAQDDED !!= * @CODE@ laʹdded:ladd
!+IV: V0_LAQDDED ;
!LEXICON TV_LAQDDED !!= * @CODE@ laʹdded:ladd
!+TV: V0_LAQDDED ;
LEXICON V0_LAQDDED !!= * @CODE@ laʹdded:ladd
!!! inflection_type="1"
! seek parallel in VIǮǮÂD
! FORMS
!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: laʹdded
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lädd
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: läʹdde
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: laʹdde
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization 
:%^V2VV%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) laaʹdd-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^V2VV%^PAL%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Imprt+Sg2: laaʹdd
!! Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^V2VV%^VOWLower VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: lääddas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: laddu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: läddaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

! (10) Allegro for incoative: laʹd»
:%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!! (11) Present Participle:
:%^PAL FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) +V+PrsPrc: laʹddi

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:%^V2VV VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: laadd-

LEXICON V_VUEQTTED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹtted:vuâtt
: V0_VUEQTTED ;
!LEXICON IV_VUEQTTED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹtted:vuâtt
!+IV: V0_VUEQTTED ;
LEXICON TV_VUEQTTED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹtted:vuâtt
+TV: V0_VUEQTTED ;
LEXICON V0_VUEQTTED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹtted:vuâtt
!!! inflection_type="1"
!! like: V_JUEQKHKHED
! Stem is Strong
! Diphthong
! Vowel shift
! FORMS

!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;		!!= * @CODE@ (1) lieʹđđed 
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; 	     		!!= * @CODE@ (2) leâđđ
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PALÄ%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ;     !!= * @CODE@ (3) leäʹđˈđe
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) liõʹđˈđe
!!  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) lieʹđ-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!!   Ger.Temp.PxSg3: jeäʹleeʹstes

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (6 lieʹđež
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (6 liõʹđež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^CC2C%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) leâđ-
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8 liõđđu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization (9)
:%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;  !!= * @CODE@ leâđˈđaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! Allegro (10) lieʹđ»
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro%>e FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!! (11) Present Participle:
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) liõʹđđi

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^CC2C VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: liõđ-


LEXICON V_JUEQKHKHED !!= * @CODE@ jueʹǩǩed:juâ%{ʹØ%}kk
: V0_JUEQKHKHED ;
LEXICON IV_JUEQKHKHED !!= * @CODE@ jueʹǩǩed:juâ%{ʹØ%}kk
+IV: V0_JUEQKHKHED ;
!LEXICON TV_JUEQKHKHED !!= * @CODE@ jueʹǩǩed:juâ%{ʹØ%}kk
!+TV: V0_JUEQKHKHED ;
LEXICON V0_JUEQKHKHED !!= * @CODE@ jueʹǩǩed:juâ%{ʹØ%}kk
!!! inflection_type="1"
! Like JURDDED
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: ???)
! 1.3 Inf in palatalization + ed (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.3.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.3.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Pot.Sg3
!   Not Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.3.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.3.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.3.1[1].1.1[231] (Diphthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!   Strong grade: 
!   Extra strong grade: 
!   Weak grade: 
!! * Yaml: **V-juekked**
! FORMS
!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: jueʹǩǩed
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juâkk
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: juẹʹǩˈǩe
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: juõʹǩˈǩe
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization 
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^KK2GG VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) jueʹjj-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^KK2GG%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: !! juõʹjjež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, 

!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^KK2GG VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: juâǥǥas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: juõkˈku
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: juâkˈkaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) Allegro for incoative: jueʹj»
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^Allegro%^PAL%^KK2GAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;
!! Secondary allegro for incoative: juâǥ»
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^Allegro%^KK2GAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!! (11) Present Participle:
:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) +V+PrsPrc: juõʹǩǩi

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^KK2GG VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: juõǥǥ


LEXICON V_KUEQDDDED !!= * @CODE@ kueʹdded:kuâdˈd
: V0_KUEQDDDED ;
!LEXICON IV_KUEQDDDED !!= * @CODE@ kueʹdded:kuâdˈd
!+IV: V0_KUEQDDDED ;
LEXICON TV_KUEQDDDED !!= * @CODE@ kueʹdded:kuâdˈd
+TV: V0_KUEQDDDED ;
LEXICON V0_KUEQDDDED !!= * @CODE@ kueʹdded:kuâdˈd
!!! inflection_type="1"
!! like: V_JUEQKHKHED
! Stem is extra Strong
! Diphthong
! Vowel shift
! FORMS

!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;		!!= * @CODE@ (1) kueʹdˈded 
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; 	     		!!= * @CODE@ (2) kuâdˈd
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PALE%^PAL%>e K ;     !!= * @CODE@ (3) kueʹdˈde
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) kuõʹdˈde
!!  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) kueʹdd-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!!   Ger.Temp.PxSg3: jeäʹleeʹstes

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CCC2CC%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) kuõʹddež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^CCC2CC%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) kuâdd-
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) kuõdˈdu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization (9)
: VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;  !!= * @CODE@ kuâdˈdaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! Allegro (10) kueʹd»
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CAllegro%>e FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!! (11) Present Participle:
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) kuõʹdˈdi

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^CCC2CC VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: kuõdd-

LEXICON V_SHIEQTTTED !!= * @CODE@ šieʹtted:kuâdˈd
: V0_SHIEQTTTED ;
